Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.420

Audit of revolving, local, and other funds and accounts.

As part of the routine audits of state agencies, the state auditor shall audit all revolving funds, local funds, and other state funds and state accounts that are not managed by or in the care of the state treasurer and that are under the control of state agencies, including but not limited to state departments, boards, and commissions. In conducting the audits of these funds and accounts, the auditor shall examine revenues and expenditures or assets and liabilities, accounting methods and procedures, and recordkeeping practices.

[ 2022 c 148 s 3; 1993 c 216 s 1.]